Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Chapter 06. Capital Project Matching Grant Programs.

Cross references. —

For legislative purpose in enacting this chapter, see § 1, ch. 80, SLA 1993 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for implementation and applicability during fiscal year 1994, see § 4, ch. 80, SLA 1993 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal capital project matching grant program, see 3 AAC 154.

For unincorporated community capital project matching grant program, see 3 AAC 155.

Sec. 37.06.010.
Municipal capital project matching grant program.

The municipal capital project matching grant program is established in the department. Grants to municipalities under this program shall be administered as provided in this section.

The municipal capital project matching grant fund is established in the department and consists of appropriations to the fund. Appropriations to the fund do not lapse except as provided in (f) of this section. The money in the fund is held by the department in custody under this subsection for each municipality. The department shall establish, for each municipality, an individual grant account within the fund. As provided in this subsection, each fiscal year the department shall allocate, to the individual grant accounts, appropriations to the fund. The department shall credit interest earned on money in an individual grant account to that account. Except as provided in (c) of this section, the amount allocated under this subsection to an individual grant account in a fiscal year is determined by multiplying the total amount appropriated to the fund during that fiscal year by a fraction,

the numerator of which equals for a municipality with a population

under 1,000, the amount equal to that population multiplied by 1.5;

of at least 1,000 but less than 5,000, the amount equal to that population multiplied by 1.4;

of at least 5,000 but not greater than 10,000, the amount equal to that population multiplied by 1.2;

of over 10,000, the amount equal to that population; and

the denominator of which equals the sum of the numerators calculated for all municipalities under (1)(A) — (D) of this subsection.

A minimum of $25,000 shall be allocated to each municipality’s individual grant account each fiscal year under (b) of this section. The department shall reduce allocations under (b) of this section on a pro rata basis, based upon the population of the municipalities, if necessary to fund the minimum amount for each municipality. If appropriations are not sufficient to fully fund the minimum amount for each municipality, the amount appropriated shall be allocated equally among the municipalities’ individual grant accounts.

By October 1 of each fiscal year, each municipality shall submit to the governor a prioritized list of capital projects and estimated costs to be financed with money from the municipality’s individual grant account established under (b) of this section. The list must include the amount and source of the local share required by AS

37.06.030

. The governor shall include in the capital improvements program presented to the legislature under AS

37.07.060

the projects submitted by each municipality that the governor recommends for funding. If, in the capital improvements program, the governor includes projects in other than the priority order submitted by a municipality, the governor shall provide the legislature with a written statement of the reasons for that action.

The legislature may make appropriations from a municipality’s individual grant account established under (b) of this section to the municipality for capital projects under this section. Subject to appropriations under this subsection and to the local share requirements of AS

37.06.030

, each municipality may draw amounts from its individual grant account for a capital project, in accordance with an appropriation for that project. In accepting a draw, the municipality covenants with the state that it will provide for the operation and maintenance of the capital project for which the draw is used for the practical life of the project, and acknowledges that the state is not responsible for operating or maintaining the capital project or for paying for its operation or maintenance. This requirement does not apply to use of money from a draw for repair or improvement of an existing facility that is operated or maintained by the state at the time that the draw is made if the repair or improvement for which the draw is used will not substantially increase the operating or maintenance costs to the state. No more than 10 percent of the total amount of money from a draw for land acquisition, or planning, design, construction, or repair of a facility may be used for administrative expenses. No more than five percent of the total amount of money from a draw for equipment or equipment repairs may be used for administrative expenses. If a municipality provides grant money from a draw to another recipient, the municipality may not use any of the money from the draw for administrative expenses. The municipality and its agents, contractors, and subcontractors shall comply with the hiring preferences under AS 36.10 in hiring employees to be paid wholly or in part with money from a draw.

A municipality shall repay to the department money drawn from its individual grant account if substantial, ongoing work on the capital project is not started within five years after the effective date of the appropriation from which the draw is funded. Money repaid shall be deposited into the general fund. Money from an allocation to a municipality’s individual grant account that has not been drawn out by the municipality within five years after the effective date of the appropriation from which the allocation is funded lapses into the general fund.

For purposes of this section, in calculating the population of a borough, the population of each city in the borough is excluded. The determination of population shall be based on the latest figures of the United States Bureau of the Census or other population data that the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development determines is reliable.

The provisions of AS

37.05.321

apply to a grant and draws made under this section, and to earnings from the grant and draws.

Before the department may pay a draw under this section to a municipality, the department shall have evidence acceptable to the department that the municipality

has a preventive maintenance plan that

includes a computerized maintenance management program, cardex system, or other formal systematic means of tracking the timing and costs associated with planned and completed maintenance activities, including scheduled preventive maintenance;

addresses energy management for buildings owned or operated by the municipality;

includes a regular custodial care program for buildings owned or operated by the municipality;

includes preventive maintenance training for facility managers and maintenance employees;

includes renewal and replacement schedules for electrical, mechanical, structural, and other components of facilities owned or operated by the municipality; and

is adequately adhering to the preventive maintenance plan.

In this section, unless specified otherwise, “department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 3 ch 80 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 98 SLA 1998; am § 38 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 84 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 7 ch 12 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (i) was enacted as (j). Relettered in 1998, at which time former (i) was relettered as (j).

In 1999, in (g) of this section, “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 91(a)(9), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (g) and (j) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal capital project matching grant program, see 3 AAC 154.

Sec. 37.06.020.
Unincorporated community capital project matching grant program.

The unincorporated community capital project matching grant program is established in the department. Grants to unincorporated communities under the program shall be administered as provided in this section.

The unincorporated community capital project matching grant fund is established in the department and consists of appropriations to the fund. Appropriations to the fund do not lapse except as provided in (h) of this section. The money in the fund is held by the department in custody under this subsection for each unincorporated community eligible for an allocation under this subsection. The department shall establish an individual grant account within the fund for each unincorporated community that was entitled to receive state aid under AS

29.60.855

during the preceding fiscal year. As provided in this subsection, each fiscal year, the department shall allocate, to the individual grant accounts, appropriations to the fund. An unincorporated community is eligible for an allocation in a fiscal year if the community was eligible to receive state aid under AS

29.60.855

during the preceding fiscal year. The department shall credit interest earned on money in an individual grant account to that account. Except as provided in (c) of this section, the amount allocated under this subsection to an individual grant account in a fiscal year is determined by dividing the total amount appropriated to the fund during that fiscal year by the number of unincorporated communities eligible for an allocation during that fiscal year.

A minimum of $25,000 shall be allocated to each eligible unincorporated community’s grant account each fiscal year under (b) of this section. If appropriations are not sufficient to fully fund the minimum amount for each eligible unincorporated community, the amount appropriated shall be allocated equally among the eligible unincorporated communities.

The department shall designate, in each eligible unincorporated community, an incorporated nonprofit entity or a Native village council that agrees to receive and spend grant money allocated to the unincorporated community’s individual grant account under (b) of this section. If there is more than one qualified entity in a community, the department shall designate the entity that the department finds most qualified to make draws from that unincorporated community’s individual grant account and spend the money. If there is no qualified incorporated nonprofit entity or Native village council in an unincorporated community that will agree to receive and spend money allocated to the community under (b) of this section, draws may not be made from the unincorporated community’s individual grant account and the amount allocated to the account lapses into the general fund.

By October 1 of each fiscal year, the incorporated nonprofit entity or Native village council designated by the department under (d) of this section shall submit to the governor a prioritized list of capital projects and estimated costs to be financed with money from the community’s individual grant account established under (b) of this section. The list must include the amount and source of the local share required by AS

37.06.030

. The governor shall include in the capital improvements program presented to the legislature under AS

37.07.060

the projects submitted by designated entities under this subsection that the governor recommends for funding. If, in the capital improvements program, the governor includes projects in other than the priority order submitted by a designated entity, the governor shall provide the legislature with a written statement of the reasons for that action.

The legislature may make appropriations, from an unincorporated community’s individual grant account established under (b) of this section, for the unincorporated community for capital projects under this section. Subject to appropriations under this subsection and to the local share requirements of AS

37.06.030

, an entity designated by the department under (d) of this section may draw, on behalf of the unincorporated community, amounts from that community’s individual grant account for a capital project in accordance with an appropriation for that project. In accepting a draw, an entity designated by the department under (d) of this section acknowledges that the state is not responsible for operating or maintaining a capital project for which the draw is used, or for paying for its operation or maintenance. The acknowledgment does not apply to use of money from a draw for repair or improvement of an existing facility that is operated or maintained by the state at the time that the draw is made if the repair or improvement for which the draw is used will not substantially increase the operating or maintenance costs to the state. No more than 10 percent of the total amount of money from a draw for land acquisition, or planning, design, construction, or repair of a facility may be used for administrative expenses. No more than five percent of the total amount of money from a draw for equipment or equipment repairs may be used for administrative expenses. The designated entity and its agents, contractors, and subcontractors shall comply with the hiring preferences under AS 36.10 in hiring employees to be paid wholly or in part with money from a draw.

An entity designated by the department under (d) of this section that is a Native village council may not draw money from an unincorporated community’s individual grant account unless the council waives immunity from suit for claims arising out of activities of the council related to the draw. A waiver of immunity from suit under this subsection must be on a form provided by the Department of Law. Neither this subsection nor any action taken under it enlarges or diminishes the governmental authority or jurisdiction of a Native village council.

An entity designated by the department under (d) of this section shall repay to the department money it has drawn from an unincorporated community’s individual grant account if substantial, ongoing work on the project is not started within five years after the effective date of the appropriation from which the draw is funded. Money repaid shall be deposited into the general fund. Money from an allocation to an unincorporated community’s individual grant account that has not been drawn out by a designated entity within five years after the effective date of the appropriation from which the allocation is funded lapses into the general fund.

The limitations of AS

44.33.745

do not apply to a grant made under this section.

The provisions of AS

37.05.321

apply to a grant and draws made under this section, and to earnings from the grant and draws.

Before the department may pay a draw under this section to an entity, the department shall have evidence acceptable to the department that the entity

has a preventive maintenance plan that

includes a computerized maintenance management program, cardex system, or other formal systematic means of tracking the timing and costs associated with planned and completed maintenance activities, including scheduled preventive maintenance;

addresses energy management for public buildings owned or operated by the entity;

includes a regular custodial care program for public buildings owned or operated by the entity;

includes preventive maintenance training for managers of public facilities owned or operated by the entity and maintenance employees;

includes renewal and replacement schedules for electrical, mechanical, structural, and other components of public facilities owned or operated by the entity; and

is adequately adhering to the preventive maintenance plan.

In this section, unless specified otherwise, “department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 3 ch 80 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 98 SLA 1998; am § 39 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 8 ch 12 SLA 2008; am § 29 ch 3 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (k) was enacted as (

l

). Relettered in 1998, at which time former (k) was relettered as (

l

).

In 1999, in (

l

) of this section, “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 91(a)(9),
ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (

l

) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3,
ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal capital project matching grant program, see 3 AAC 154.

For unincorporated community capital project matching grant program, see 3 AAC 155.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (k)(1)(A), substituted “scheduled preventive maintenance” for “scheduled preventative maintenance” at the end.

Sec. 37.06.030.
Local share requirements.

For each draw made by a municipality under AS

37.06.010

, the municipality shall contribute a local share to the cost of the capital project for which the draw is made. The amount of the local share equals the local share percentage as calculated under (1) of this subsection, divided by the state share percentage as calculated under (2) of this subsection, multiplied by the amount of the draw. For purposes of this subsection,

the local share percentage is

30 percent for a municipality with a population of 5,000 or more;

for a municipality with a population of 1,000 — 4,999, the greater of

15 percent; or

the percentage obtained by dividing the amount that would be received by the municipality from a property tax levy of 1/1000th of a mill for each $1,000 of grant funds received by the sum of that first amount plus the amount of the grant or draw, but not more than 30 percent;

for a municipality with a population of under 1,000, the greater of

five percent; or

the percentage obtained by dividing the amount that would be received by the municipality from a property tax levy of 1/1000th of a mill for each $1,000 of grant funds received by the sum of that first amount plus the amount of the grant or draw, but not more than 30 percent;

the state share percentage equals one minus the local share percentage;

the local share to be contributed by a municipality may be satisfied with (A) federal, municipal, or local money; (B) labor, materials, or equipment used directly in the construction of the project, or land, including land transferred by the state to the municipality; the department shall determine the value of a contribution under this subparagraph; (C) money from another nonstate source; (D) money received by the municipality under AS

29.60.850

—

29.60.879

; (E) state taxes refunded or reimbursed to the municipality whose use for the purposes of this subsection is not prohibited; (F) allocations of state aid for the costs of school construction debt under AS

14.11.100

; and (G) money obtained from the sale or lease of land or other assets transferred by the state to the municipality; except as provided in this paragraph, the local share may not be satisfied with money from, or with the portion of an asset that was obtained with money from, an appropriation, allocation, entitlement, grant, or other payment from the state.

For each draw made by an entity or council under AS

37.06.020

, the incorporated entity or Native village council that makes the draw shall contribute a local share of the cost of the capital project for which the draw is made. The amount of the local share equals the local share percentage as calculated under (1) of this subsection, divided by the state share percentage as calculated under (2) of this subsection, multiplied by the amount of the draw. For purposes of this subsection,

the local share percentage is five percent;

the state share percentage equals one minus the local share percentage;

the local share may be satisfied from (A) federal or local money; (B) labor, materials, or equipment used directly in the construction of the project, or land, including land transferred by the state; the department shall determine the value of a contribution under this subparagraph; (C) money from another nonstate source; (D) money received by the unincorporated community under AS

29.60.850

—

29.60.879

; or (E) money obtained from the sale or lease of land or other assets transferred by the state; except as provided in this paragraph, the local share may not be satisfied with money from, or with the portion of an asset that was obtained with money from, an appropriation, allocation, entitlement, grant, or other payment from the state.

For purposes of (a) of this section, in calculating the population of a borough the population of each city in the borough is excluded. The determination of population shall be based on the latest figures of the United States Bureau of the Census or other population data that the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development determines is reliable.

History.

(§ 3 ch 80 SLA 1993; am § 9 ch 12 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (c) of this section, “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 91(a)(9), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (c) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal capital project matching grant program, see 3 AAC 154.

For unincorporated community capital project matching grant program, see 3 AAC 155.

Sec. 37.06.040.
Municipalities organized under federal law.

An entity organized under federal law as an Indian reserve that existed before enactment of 43 U.S.C. 1618(a) and is continued in existence under that subsection is a municipality for purposes of AS

37.06.010

—

37.06.090

and may not receive a grant under AS

37.06.020

. In addition to other eligibility requirements applicable to municipalities, to qualify to receive a grant under AS

37.06.010

, a municipality organized under federal law as an Indian reserve shall form a community development corporation with authority to determine how the grant money will be used. The corporation’s charter must require that the governing board of the corporation shall be elected at an annual election open to all residents of the municipality who are registered and qualified to vote in state elections. The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development may distribute money for the municipality only to a corporation organized in accordance with this section and only after the corporation has delivered a written waiver of sovereign immunity from legal action by the state to recover all or a portion of the money distributed under AS 37.06.010.

History.

(§ 1 ch 67 SLA 1997; am § 40 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 37.06.080.
Adoption of regulations.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development

may adopt regulations that impose additional requirements or procedures to implement, interpret, make specific, or otherwise carry out the provisions of this chapter;

shall adopt regulations providing for periodic audits of the use of money for grants under this chapter, including audit of the department’s determination of the value of, and adequacy of the verification of the actual use of, locally funded or contributed labor on projects funded by a grant under this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 80 SLA 1993; am § 41 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For municipal capital project matching grant program, see 3 AAC 154.

For unincorporated community capital project matching grant program, see 3 AAC 155.

Sec. 37.06.090.
Definition of “capital project.”

In this chapter, “capital project” means a project with a cost exceeding $10,000 to acquire or improve an asset with an anticipated life exceeding one year and includes land acquisition, construction, repair or structural improvement of a facility, engineering and design for a facility, and acquisition or repair of equipment.

History.

(§ 3 ch 80 SLA 1993)